Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 85

Disaster Service Volunteer Leave Act

12-85-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Certified disaster service volunteer” means a person who has completed the necessary training for being and has been certified as a disaster service technician, specialist, coordinator, or officer by the American Red Cross;

“Disaster” means a natural or technological event as defined in § 12-75-103(2) in which victims cannot recover without assistance when such disaster is designated at Level II or above in the American National Red Cross Regulations and Procedures;

“Specialized disaster relief” means one (1) or more of the following American Red Cross service categories in which a certified disaster service volunteer is trained:

Shelter management;

Mass feeding;

Family services;

Health services;

Public assistance inquiries;

Damage assessment;

A support function for services provided under subdivisions (3)(A)-(F) of this section; and

Any other service performed for the American Red Cross for which training is required; and

“State agency” means any agency, authority, board, bureau, commission, council, department, office, or officer of the state receiving an appropriation by the General Assembly.

The term does not include state-supported institutions of higher learning or any county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 268, § 1.

12-85-102. Terms of leave.

An employee of a state agency or an employee of a state-supported institution of higher learning may be granted leave from work with pay for not more than fifteen (15) working days in any calendar year to participate in specialized disaster relief, without loss of seniority, pay, annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, offset time, or overtime wages if the employee:

Is trained and certified as a disaster service volunteer by the American Red Cross;

Has specialized disaster relief services that are requested by the American Red Cross in connection with a disaster; and

Obtains consent from the chief executive officer of his or her state agency or state-supported institution of higher learning.

The state agency or state-supported institution of higher learning shall compensate an employee granted leave under this section at the employee's regular rate of pay for those regular work hours during which the employee is absent from work.

Leave under this subchapter shall be granted only for disaster relief services occurring within the State of Arkansas or for disaster relief services occurring within states contiguous to the State of Arkansas.

An employee deemed to be on leave under this chapter shall not be deemed to be an employee of the state or of a state-supported institution of higher learning for purposes of workers' compensation.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 383, inserted “or state-supported institution of higher learning” in (a) and (b); in (a), inserted “or an employee of a state-supported institution of higher learning” and “or her”; inserted “or of a state-supported institution of higher learning” in (d); and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 489, substituted “calendar year” for “twelve-month period” in (a); and made a minor stylistic change.

Cross References. Attendance and leave, §21-4-101 et seq.

Workers' Compensation, §11-9-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment inserted “and employees of state-supported institutions of higher learning” in (a)(1); inserted “or state-supported institution of higher learning” in (a)(2); and made stylistic changes.

[Reserved]

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 268, § 2; 1999, No. 383, § 1; 1999, No. 489, § 1.

12-85-103. Limitation on certified volunteers — Lists, reports, guidelines, etc.

(1)Notwithstanding the provisions of §12-85-102, the number of state employees and employees of state-supported institutions of higher learning certified as disaster service volunteers shall not exceed one hundred (100) participants at any one (1) time.

A list of such employees shall be maintained by the American Red Cross, with pertinent information provided to the state employer or state-supported institution of higher learning of each disaster service volunteer.

Within sixty (60) days of any request made by the American Red Cross, a report shall be prepared by the American Red Cross and submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration stating the reasons and needs for any request made.

The American Red Cross and the respective agencies with employees participating in the disaster service volunteer program shall promulgate necessary guidelines and directives to implement this chapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 268, § 3; 1999, No. 383, § 2.